data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SET ISO-8859-1
LANG pt_PT
TRY aerisontcdmlupvgbfzáhçqjíxãóéêâúõACMPSBTELGRIFVDkHJONôywUKXZWQÁYÍÉàÓèÂÚ
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

ICONV 2
ICONV ´ '
ICONV ´ '

WORDCHARS -

NOSUGGEST Ý

PFX 0 Y 80
PFX 0   0               atto            [^rsho]           PFSEM=atto+
PFX 0   0               atto-           [ho]              PFSEM=atto+
PFX 0   0               attor           r                 PFSEM=atto+
PFX 0   0               attos           s                 PFSEM=atto+
PFX 0   0               centi           [^rshi]           PFSEM=centi+
PFX 0   0               centi-          [hi]              PFSEM=centi+
PFX 0   0               centir          r                 PFSEM=centi+
PFX 0   0               centis          s                 PFSEM=centi+
PFX 0   0               deca            [^rsha]           PFSEM=deca+
PFX 0   0               deca-           [ha]              PFSEM=deca+
PFX 0   0               decar           r                 PFSEM=deca+
PFX 0   0               decas           s                 PFSEM=deca+
PFX 0   0               deci            [^rshi]           PFSEM=deci+
PFX 0   0               deci-           [hi]              PFSEM=deci+
PFX 0   0               decir           r                 PFSEM=deci+
PFX 0   0               decis           s                 PFSEM=deci+
PFX 0   0               exa             [^rsha]           PFSEM=exa+
PFX 0   0               exa-            [ha]              PFSEM=exa+
PFX 0   0               exar            r                 PFSEM=exa+
PFX 0   0               exas            s                 PFSEM=exa+
PFX 0   0               femto           [^rsho]           PFSEM=femto+
PFX 0   0               femto-          [ho]              PFSEM=femto+
PFX 0   0               femtor          r                 PFSEM=femto+
PFX 0   0               femtos          s                 PFSEM=femto+
PFX 0   0               giga            [^rsha]           PFSEM=giga+
PFX 0   0               giga-           [ha]              PFSEM=giga+
PFX 0   0               gigar           r                 PFSEM=giga+
PFX 0   0               gigas           s                 PFSEM=giga+
PFX 0   0               hecto           [^rsho]           PFSEM=hecto+
PFX 0   0               hecto-          [ho]              PFSEM=hecto+
PFX 0   0               hector          r                 PFSEM=hecto+
PFX 0   0               hectos          s                 PFSEM=hecto+
PFX 0   0               mega            [^rsha]           PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               mega-           [ha]              PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               megar           r                 PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               megas           s                 PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               micro           [^rsho]           PFSEM=micro+
PFX 0   0               micro-          [ho]              PFSEM=micro+
PFX 0   0               micror          r                 PFSEM=micro+
PFX 0   0               micros          s                 PFSEM=micro+
PFX 0   0               mili            [^rshi]           PFSEM=mili+
PFX 0   0               mili-           [hi]              PFSEM=mili+
PFX 0   0               milir           r                 PFSEM=mili+
PFX 0   0               milis           s                 PFSEM=mili+
PFX 0   0               nano            [^rsho]           PFSEM=nano+
PFX 0   0               nano-           [ho]              PFSEM=nano+
PFX 0   0               nanor           r                 PFSEM=nano+
PFX 0   0               nanos           s                 PFSEM=nano+
PFX 0   0               peta            [^rsha]           PFSEM=peta+
PFX 0   0               peta-           [ha]              PFSEM=peta+
PFX 0   0               petar           r                 PFSEM=peta+
PFX 0   0               petas           s                 PFSEM=peta+
PFX 0   0               pico            [^rsho]           PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               pico-           [ho]              PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               picor           r                 PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               picos           s                 PFSEM=mega+
PFX 0   0               quilo           [^rsho]           PFSEM=quilo+
PFX 0   0               quilo-          [ho]              PFSEM=quilo+
PFX 0   0               quilor          r                 PFSEM=quilo+
PFX 0   0               quilos          s                 PFSEM=quilo+
PFX 0   0               tera            [^rsha]           PFSEM=tera+
PFX 0   0               tera-           [ha]              PFSEM=tera+
PFX 0   0               terar           r                 PFSEM=tera+
PFX 0   0               teras           s                 PFSEM=tera+
PFX 0   0               yocto           [^rsho]           PFSEM=yocto+
PFX 0   0               yocto-          [ho]              PFSEM=yocto+
PFX 0   0               yoctor          r                 PFSEM=yocto+
PFX 0   0               yoctos          s                 PFSEM=yocto+
PFX 0   0               yota            [^rsha]           PFSEM=yotta+
PFX 0   0               yota-           [ha]              PFSEM=yotta+
PFX 0   0               yotar           r                 PFSEM=yotta+
PFX 0   0               yotas           s                 PFSEM=yotta+
PFX 0   0               zepto           [^rsho]           PFSEM=zepto+
PFX 0   0               zepto-          [ho]              PFSEM=zepto+
PFX 0   0               zeptor          r                 PFSEM=zepto+
PFX 0   0               zeptos          s                 PFSEM=zepto+
PFX 0   0               zetta           [^rsha]           PFSEM=zetta+
PFX 0   0               zetta-          [ha]              PFSEM=zetta+
PFX 0   0               zettar          r                 PFSEM=zetta+
PFX 0   0               zettas          s                 PFSEM=zetta+

PFX A Y 4
PFX A   0               anti            [^hirs]         PFSEM=anti+
PFX A   0               antir           r               PFSEM=anti+
PFX A   0               antis           s               PFSEM=anti+
PFX A   0               anti-           [hi]            PFSEM=anti+

PFX Z Y 4
PFX Z   0               auto            [^hors]         PFSEM=auto+
PFX Z   0               autor           r               PFSEM=auto+
PFX Z   0               autos           s               PFSEM=auto+
PFX Z   0               auto-           [ho]            PFSEM=auto+

PFX S Y 2
PFX S   0               des             [^h]            PFSEM=not+
PFX S   h               des             h               PFSEM=not+

PFX I Y 4
PFX I   0               in              [^plmr]         PFSEM=not+
PFX I   0               im              p               PFSEM=not+
PFX I   0               i               [lm]            PFSEM=not+
PFX I   0               ir              r               PFSEM=not+

PFX R Y 2
PFX R   0               re              [^s]            PFSEM=outra+
PFX R   0               res             s               PFSEM=outra+

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0               pré-            .               PFSEM=pre+

PFX O Y 1
PFX O   0               pós-            .               PFSEM=pos+

PFX u Y 2
PFX u   0               sub-            [bhr]           PFSEM=sub+
PFX u   0               sub             [^bhr]          PFSEM=sub+

PFX x Y 1
PFX x   0               ex-             .               PFSEM=ex+

PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0               vice-           .               PFSEM=vice+

PFX F Y 3
PFX F   0               ultra           .               PFSEM=ultra+
PFX F   0               super           .               PFSEM=super+
PFX F   0               hiper           .               PFSEM=hiper+
