data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
aborto/pA
acordo/pSE
atividade/Ip
adaptabilidade/Ip
adesão/pE
adormecer/XYPLRMD
agravar/XYPLSMn
alinhar/XYPLMDR
almirante/pVx
aluno/fpx
amear/ZYPL
ânimo/pS
aproveitar/XYPLRScMDnvu
aproximar/XYPLcBRv
ártico/fpu
aromatizar/XYPLScnD
arrendar/XYPLcMDvu
artrítico/Afp
asnear/ZYL
atómico/fpu
autarca/px
aviso/pE
baldear/ZYPLcD
barlaventear/ZYL
bofetear/ZYPL
bronzear/ZYPLMD
campeão/pbTxV
canceroso/fpA
candidatar/XYLR
candidato/fpREx
canhonear/ZYPL
capítulo/up
carro/plA
cavaquear/ZYLD
chancelaria/pV
chanceler/pxV
charlatanear/ZYL
chefe/puxV
ciclone/pA
coagular/XYPLScDnv
codificar/XYPLScDvR
codiretor/x
colombiano/fpE
colonial/ptiA
colónia/px
colorear/ZYPL
combatente/px
comissão/pu
cómodo/Ifp
componente/pu
comum/pmI
comunista/px
concessionário/fpu
conclusivo/fpIm
condicional/pidIm
conformável/pI
confortar/XYPLRcMDnS
confortável/pmS
congelante/Ap
conjugal/ApEO
conjunto/fpmu
cônsul/xVe/pl
contar/XYPLDvR
contestável/pI
contínuo/fpS
contracto/up
corcovear/ZYL
credível/dIp
critério/pu
culpar/XYPLSv
cutâneo/fpu
datar/XYPLcDEO
deduzir/ZYPLc
definição/pI
definir/XYPLRcDvE
delegado/ufp
democracia/Aqp
depressivo/fpA
desenvolver/XYPLMnuB
desenxamear/ZYPL
deslizante/Ap
determinar/XYPLcDnvE
detonante/Ap
dialeto/pu
direção/pI
direcionar/XYLRM
dirigente/xp
discriminativo/Ifp
disferir/ZYPL
domabilidade/Ip
domínio/up
eficiência/pI
eliminatória/Ep
emigrante/px
empastelar/XYPLSMD
empregar/XYPLRSDu
emprego/pu
empreiteiro/puf
encarcerar/XYPLRScM
enformar/XYPDS
engenharia/pR
engradear/ZYPLM
equilíbrio/pSR
errância/I
escassear/ZYL
escolar/pdE
espécie/up
esquerdista/px
estruturar/XYPLRcvDnS
existente/pE
fandanguear/ZYPL
fascismo/pAO
fascista/pAO
fazer/KPLDSRv
federal/tiA
filo/pu
fogo/pA
fornecedor/fup
fosforear/ZYL
funcionário/fpx
gasear/ZYPLM
gerente/puV
glacial/Ep
golpear/ZYPLMn
governador/fpxV
graduar/XYPLcMDO
guarnecer/XYPLSMD
guerra/pEO
guerrilheiro/fpx
higiénico/fpHA
humano/fpmtidSu
igualdade/Sp
imputável/pI
industrial/pmtiEO
inicializar/XYLRc
inquilino/fpx
interferir/ZYL
intoxicação/phS
júnior/x
justiça/pI
justificável/pI
lanço/pu
ler/YPLDnR
liberal/pmtidA
manusear/ZYPLcMv
marido/px
milionário/fpx
ministro/fpxV
mobilizar/XYPLScDv
modelo/pitu
moderno/fpmtidGEOs
modesto/fpmIs
monarca/px
namorado/fpxlh
nazi/pA
noivo/xfp
nuclear/pA
nupcial/pdEO
obstrução/pS
oitavar/ZYPL
operatório/fpEO
operável/Ip
pagar/XYPLMDnvE
passear/ZYPLDn
patriota/piA
penitente/pmI
perfeito/fpIms
plantar/XYPLRcD
poluir/KPLcvDS
pompear/ZYPLn
presidência/pV
presidente/pTxV
primário/fpEH
prisioneiro/fpx
problema/pu
produção/pEO
proteção/pSF
puberdade/EIp
publicar/XYPLcDvE
rabequear/ZYL
racionalidade/Ip
racista/Ap
ramo/plu
regenerabilidade/phZ
rei/Vp
reitorado/Vp
reitoria/pV
reitor/fpuVx
religioso/fpmidA
representar/XYPLcDnvu
responsabilidade/Ip
restrito/fpmI
revolucionário/fpHAE
rodear/ZYPLMD
romano/fptiEO
romântico/fpEOH
romantismo/pEO
roubo/pA
sacralizar/XYPLcS
secretário/fpxV
segurança/pI
seleção/pE
semita/ipA
senador/fpx
sensato/fpmI
sistema/pu
sobrenomear/ZYPL
social/pmtiA
soviético/fpAOx
submarino/fpA
submissão/pI
sucesso/pI
sudorífico/fpA
sustentabilidade/pI
temporada/pE
terrorista/Ap
traduzir/ZYPLDv
tribo/pu
ultrapassável/pI
utilizar/XYPLcDvRu
valorizar/XYPLScRun
veículo/plA
venda/pO
venenoso/fpdA
vereador/fpx
viral/pA
visível/pmdI
zaragatear/ZYL
Jugoslávia/x
URSS/x
consente/LS
invisto/PLRS
investi/PLRS
empedirnais/SL
ajuizais/SL
enraízo/SL
bulamos/RL
descubrais/RPL
cubram/SRL
colorimos/SL
começas/PLS
medimos/PLR
expeça/LR
obstruiu/SL
obstruiríeis/SL
obstruíssem/SL
destruiríeis/SL
construíamos/SLR
construíramos/SLR
construiriam/SLR
construíra/SLR
construísses/SLR
púnhamos/PLR
poreis/PLR
poria/PLR
compomos/PLR
compuséramos/PLR
compusésseis/PLR
compostas/PLR
negociam/R
kelvin/p0
candela/p0
esferorradiano/p0
katal/p0
tesla/p0
lux/p0
Eocénico/EO
Eoceno/EO
Miocénico/EO
Mioceno/EO
Oligoceno/EO
Paleocénico/EO
Paleoceno/EO
Pliocénico/EO
Plioceno/EO
ampere/0lp
coulomb/0p
diretor/Vfpux
farad/0p
formular/DLPRXYcp
glaciar/EOclp
grama/0hp
grau/0lp
henry/0p
hertz/0p
joule/0lp
líder/px
lúmen/0lp
mole/0mp
múltiplo/fpu
natal/Edlp
newton/0p
oxidante/Ap
pascal/0lmp
radiano/0lp
regulamentar/ALPSXYcp
segundo/0fp
volt/0lp
watt/0lp
Oligocénico/EO
toilette//=GIORafpr
becquerel/0p
siemens/0
gray/0p
sievert/0p
weber/0p
ohm/0
ohms/0
Cenozoico/EOfp
Eozoico/EOfp
Fanerozoico/EOfp
Neozoico/EOfp
Proterozoico/EOfp
energizar/ZYL
periciar/ZYL
ajavardar/ZYL
